Hawaii statutes.
§560:1-104 Severability. If any
provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or
circumstances is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions
or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are
declared to be severable. [L 1996, c 288, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next